test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Nouns_fleetingvowels.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - любовь M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      любовь+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: любо́вь
      любовь+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: любо́вь
      любовь+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: любви́
      любовь+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: любви́
      любовь+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: любви́
      любовь+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: любо́вью
      любовь+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: любви́
      любовь+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: любви́
      любовь+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: любве́й
      любовь+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: любвя́х
      любовь+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: любвя́м
      любовь+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: любвя́ми
  Noun - башня M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      башня+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: ба́шня
      башня+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: ба́шню
      башня+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: ба́шни
      башня+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: ба́шне
      башня+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: ба́шне
      башня+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: ба́шней
      башня+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: ба́шни
      башня+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: ба́шни
      башня+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: ба́шен
      башня+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: ба́шнях
      башня+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: ба́шням
      башня+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: ба́шнями
  Noun - копейка M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      копейка+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: копе́йка
      копейка+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: копе́йку
      копейка+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: копе́йки
      копейка+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: копе́йке
      копейка+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: копе́йке
      копейка+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: копе́йкой
      копейка+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: копе́йки
      копейка+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: копе́йки
      копейка+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: копе́ек
      копейка+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: копе́йках
      копейка+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: копе́йкам
      копейка+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: копе́йками
  Noun - свадьба M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      свадьба+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: сва́дьба
      свадьба+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: сва́дьбу
      свадьба+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: сва́дьбы
      свадьба+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: сва́дьбе
      свадьба+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: сва́дьбе
      свадьба+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: сва́дьбой
      свадьба+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: сва́дьбы
      свадьба+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: сва́дьбы
      свадьба+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: сва́деб
      свадьба+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: сва́дьбах
      свадьба+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: сва́дьбам
      свадьба+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: сва́дьбами
  Noun - земля M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      земля+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: земля́
      земля+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: зе́млю
      земля+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: земли́
      земля+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: земле́
      земля+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: земле́
      земля+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: землёй
      земля+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: зе́мли
      земля+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: зе́мли
      земля+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: земе́ль
      земля+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: зе́млях
      земля+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: зе́млям
      земля+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: зе́млями
  Noun - сестра M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      сестра+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: сестра́
      сестра+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: сестру́
      сестра+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: сестры́
      сестра+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: сестре́
      сестра+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: сестре́
      сестра+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: сестро́й
      сестра+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: сёстры
      сестра+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Anim: сестёр
      сестра+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: сестёр
      сестра+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: сёстрах
      сестра+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: сёстрам
      сестра+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: сёстрами
  Noun - отец M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      отец+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: оте́ц
      отец+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Anim: отца́
      отец+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: отца́
      отец+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: отце́
      отец+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: отцу́
      отец+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: отцо́м
      отец+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: отцы́
      отец+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Anim: отцо́в
      отец+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: отцо́в
      отец+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: отца́х
      отец+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: отца́м
      отец+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: отца́ми
  Noun - распутье M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      распутье+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: распу́тье
      распутье+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: распу́тье
      распутье+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: распу́тья
      распутье+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: распу́тье
      распутье+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: распу́тью
      распутье+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: распу́тьем
      распутье+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: распу́тья
      распутье+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: распу́тья
      распутье+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: распу́тий
      распутье+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: распу́тьях
      распутье+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: распу́тьям
      распутье+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: распу́тьями
  Noun - окно M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      окно+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: окно́
      окно+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: окно́
      окно+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: окна́
      окно+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: окне́
      окно+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: окну́
      окно+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: окно́м
      окно+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: о́кна
      окно+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: о́кна
      окно+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: о́кон
      окно+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: о́кнах
      окно+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: о́кнам
      окно+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: о́кнами
  Noun - письмо M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      письмо+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: письмо́
      письмо+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: письмо́
      письмо+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: письма́
      письмо+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: письме́
      письмо+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: письму́
      письмо+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: письмо́м
      письмо+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: пи́сьма
      письмо+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: пи́сьма
      письмо+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: пи́сем
      письмо+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: пи́сьмах
      письмо+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: пи́сьмам
      письмо+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: пи́сьмами
  Noun - яйцо M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      яйцо+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: яйцо́
      яйцо+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: яйцо́
      яйцо+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: яйца́
      яйцо+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: яйце́
      яйцо+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: яйцу́
      яйцо+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: яйцо́м
      яйцо+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: я́йца
      яйцо+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: я́йца
      яйцо+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: яи́ц
      яйцо+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: я́йцах
      яйцо+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: я́йцам
      яйцо+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: я́йцами
  Noun - сердце M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      сердце+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: се́рдце
      сердце+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: се́рдце
      сердце+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: се́рдца
      сердце+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: се́рдце
      сердце+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: се́рдцу
      сердце+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: се́рдцем
      сердце+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: сердца́
      сердце+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: сердца́
      сердце+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: серде́ц
      сердце+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: сердца́х
      сердце+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: сердца́м
      сердце+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: сердца́ми
